Idaho statutes. Title 37 FOOD, DRUGS, AND OIL
Chapter 27 UNIFORM CONTROLLED SUBSTANCES
§ 37-2744. Forfeitures.

The following are subject to forfeiture:

All controlled substances that have been manufactured, distributed, dispensed, acquired, possessed or held in violation of this act or with respect to which there has been any act by any person in violation of this act;

All raw materials, products and equipment of any kind that are used, or intended for use, in manufacturing, compounding, processing, delivering, importing, or exporting any controlled substances or counterfeit substances in violation of this act;

All property that is used, or intended for use, as a container for property used in the commission of an act prohibited by section 37-2732B, 37-2732(a) or (b), or 37-2737A, Idaho Code;

All conveyances, including aircraft, vehicles, or vessels, that are used, or intended for use, to transport, or in any manner to facilitate the transportation, delivery, receipt or manufacture of substances as prohibited by section 37-2732B, 37-2732(a) or (b), or 37-2737A, Idaho Code, but:

No conveyance used by any person as a common carrier in the transaction of business as a common carrier is subject to forfeiture under this section unless it appears that the owner or other person in charge of the conveyance is a consenting party or privy to a violation of this act;

No conveyance is subject to forfeiture under this section if the owner establishes that he could not have known in the exercise of reasonable diligence that the conveyance was being used, had been used, was intended to be used or had been intended to be used in any manner described in subsection (a)(4) of this section;

A forfeiture of a conveyance encumbered by a bona fide security interest is subject to the interest of the secured party if the security interest was created without any knowledge or reason to believe that the conveyance was being used, had been used, was intended to be used, or had been intended to be used for the purpose alleged.

All books, records, and research products and materials, including formulas, microfilm, tapes, and data that are used, or intended for use, in violation of this act.

All moneys, currency, negotiable instruments, securities or other items easily liquidated for cash, such as, but not limited to, jewelry, stocks and bonds, or other property described in paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection that is found in close proximity to property described in paragraph (1), (2), (3), (5), (7) or (8) of this subsection and that has been used or is intended for use in connection with the illegal manufacture, distribution, dispensing or possession of property described in paragraph (1), (2), (3), (5), (7) or (8) of this subsection;
(6)(A) All moneys, currency, negotiable instruments, securities or other items easily liquidated for cash, such as, but not limited to, jewelry, stocks and bonds, or other property described in paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection that is found in close proximity to property described in paragraph (1), (2), (3), (5), (7) or (8) of this subsection and that has been used or is intended for use in connection with the illegal manufacture, distribution, dispensing or possession of property described in paragraph (1), (2), (3), (5), (7) or (8) of this subsection;

Items described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph or other things of value furnished or intended to be furnished by any person in exchange for a contraband controlled substance in violation of this chapter, all proceeds, including items of property traceable to such an exchange, and all moneys or other things of value used or intended to be used to facilitate any violation of this chapter, except that no property shall be forfeited under this paragraph to the extent of the interest of an owner, by reason of any act or omission established by that owner to have been committed or omitted without the knowledge or consent of that owner.

All drug paraphernalia as defined by section 37-2701, Idaho Code.

All simulated controlled substances, which are used or intended for use in violation of this chapter.
(9) All weapons, or firearms, which are used in any manner to facilitate a violation of the provisions of this chapter.

Property subject to forfeiture under this chapter may be seized by the director, or any peace officer of this state, upon process issued by any district court, or magistrate division thereof, having jurisdiction over the property. Seizure without process may be made if:

The seizure is incident to an arrest or a search under a search warrant or an inspection under an administrative inspection warrant;

The property subject to seizure has been the subject of a prior judgment in favor of the state in a criminal racketeering or civil forfeiture proceeding based upon a violation of this chapter;

Probable cause exists to believe that the property is directly or indirectly dangerous to health or safety; or

Probable cause exists to believe that the property was used or is intended to be used in violation of this chapter.

In the event of seizure pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, proceedings under subsection (d) of this section shall be instituted promptly.

When property is seized under this section, the director or the peace officer who seized the property may:

Place the property under seal;

Remove the property to a place designated by him; or

Take custody of the property and remove it to an appropriate location for disposition in accordance with law.

The peace officer who seized the property shall within five (5) days notify the director of such seizure.

In the event of seizure pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, proceedings under subsection (d) of this section shall be instituted within thirty (30) days by the director or appropriate prosecuting attorney.

Property taken or detained under this section may be subject to replevin during the pendency of the forfeiture proceedings upon a hearing and finding by the district court, or magistrate division thereof, having jurisdiction over the forfeiture proceedings, that the property is: (i) reasonably necessary for the owner’s employment or personal use, that the property will not be disposed of or used for criminal activity, and that reasonable security has been posted; or (ii) that the seizure violated the provisions of this section. The right of replevin shall terminate upon an order of forfeiture as set forth in this section. Property that is being held that has evidentiary value in the underlying criminal case shall not be subject to replevin. Forfeiture proceedings shall be civil actions against the property subject to forfeiture and the standard of proof shall be preponderance of the evidence.

All property described in paragraphs (1), (7) and (8) of subsection (a) of this section shall be deemed contraband and shall be summarily forfeited to the state. Controlled substances that are seized or come into possession of the state, the owners of which are unknown, shall be deemed contraband and shall be summarily forfeited to the state.

When property described in paragraphs (2), (3), (4), (5), (6) or (9) of subsection (a) of this section is seized pursuant to this section, forfeiture proceedings shall be filed in the office of the clerk of the district court for the county wherein such property is seized. The procedure governing such proceedings shall be the same as that prescribed for civil proceedings by the Idaho rules of civil procedure. The court shall determine whether such property was used, or intended for use, in violation of this chapter. The court shall also determine whether a property forfeiture is proportionate to the crime alleged, charged or proven. Factors to be considered by the court in making such a determination shall include, but are not limited to, the nature and severity of the crime, the fair market value of the property, the intangible or subjective value of the property, the hardship to the defendant, the effect of forfeiture on the defendant’s family or financial circumstances, and any other sanctions or penalties that have been imposed upon the defendant. The court may tailor the forfeiture of property according to its determination of proportionality as justice requires.
(3) When conveyances, including aircraft, vehicles, or vessels, are seized pursuant to this section, a complaint instituting forfeiture proceedings shall be filed in the office of the clerk of the district court for the county wherein such conveyance is seized.

Notice of forfeiture proceedings shall be given to each owner or party in interest who has a right, title, or interest which in the case of a conveyance shall be determined by the record in the Idaho transportation department, or a similar department of another state if the records are maintained in that state, by serving a copy of the complaint and summons according to one (1) of the following methods:

Within twenty (20) days after the mailing or publication of the notice, the owner of the conveyance or claimant may file a verified answer and claim to the property described in the complaint instituting forfeiture proceedings.

If at the end of twenty (20) days after the notice has been mailed there is no verified answer on file, the court shall hear evidence upon the fact of the unlawful use, or intent to use, and shall order the property forfeited to the director, or appropriate prosecuting attorney, if such fact is proved.

If a verified answer is filed, the forfeiture proceeding shall be set for hearing before the court without a jury on a day not less than thirty (30) days therefrom; and the proceeding shall have priority over other civil cases.

When property is forfeited under this section, or is received from a federal enforcement agency, the director, or appropriate prosecuting attorney, may:

Upon a showing that the property as set forth in this section is suited for and likely to be used for law enforcement activities, the plaintiff or law enforcement agency may, with judicial approval, retain it for official use;

Sell that which is not required to be destroyed by law and which is not harmful to the public.

Take custody of the property and remove it for disposition in accordance with law.

The director or any peace officer of this state seizing any of the property described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subsection (a) of this section shall cause a written inventory to be made and maintain custody of the same until all legal actions have been exhausted unless such property has been placed in lawful custody of a court or state or federal law enforcement agency. After all legal actions have been exhausted with respect to such property, the property shall be surrendered by the court, law enforcement agency, or person having custody of the same to the director to be destroyed pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subsection. The property shall be accompanied with a written inventory on forms furnished by the director.
(f)(1) The director or any peace officer of this state seizing any of the property described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subsection (a) of this section shall cause a written inventory to be made and maintain custody of the same until all legal actions have been exhausted unless such property has been placed in lawful custody of a court or state or federal law enforcement agency. After all legal actions have been exhausted with respect to such property, the property shall be surrendered by the court, law enforcement agency, or person having custody of the same to the director to be destroyed pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subsection. The property shall be accompanied with a written inventory on forms furnished by the director.

All property described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subsection (a) of this section that is seized or surrendered under the provisions of this act may be destroyed after all legal actions have been exhausted. The destruction shall be done under the supervision of the Idaho state police by a representative of the office of the director. An official record listing the property destroyed and the location of destruction shall be kept on file at the office of the director. Except, however, that the director of the Idaho state police or his designee may authorize the destruction of drug or nondrug evidence, or store those items at government expense when, in the opinion of the director or his designee, it is not reasonable to remove or transport such items from the location of the seizure for destruction. In such case, a representative sample will be removed and preserved for evidentiary purposes and, when practicable, destroyed as otherwise is in accordance with this chapter. On-site destruction of such items shall be witnessed by at least two (2) persons, one (1) of whom shall be the director or his designee who shall make a record of the destruction.

Species of plants from which controlled substances in schedules I and II may be derived that have been planted or cultivated in violation of this act, or of which the owners or cultivators are unknown, or that are wild growths, may be seized and summarily forfeited to the state.

The failure, upon demand by the director, or his duly authorized agent, of the person in occupancy or in control of land or premises upon which the species of plants are growing or being stored, to produce an appropriate registration, or proof that he is the holder thereof, constitutes authority for the seizure and forfeiture of the plants.

The director shall have the authority to enter upon any land or into any dwelling pursuant to a search warrant, to cut, harvest, carry off or destroy such plants described in subsection (g) of this section.

On or before March 31, 2019, and by March 31 of each year thereafter, each state or local law enforcement agency in this state that has seized or forfeited property pursuant to this section shall retain the following information from the previous calendar year:

Name of the law enforcement agency that seized the property;

Date of seizure;

Type and description of property seized, including make, model, year, and serial number, if applicable;

Crime, if any, for which the suspect has been charged, including whether such crime is a violation of state or federal law;

Criminal case number, if any;

Outcome, if any, of suspect’s case;

If forfeiture was not processed under state law, the reason for the federal transfer, if known;

Forfeiture case number;

Date of forfeiture decision;

Whether there was a forfeiture settlement agreement;

Date and outcome of property disposition as described by one (1) of the following: returned to owner, partially returned to owner, sold, destroyed, or retained by law enforcement; and

Value of the property forfeited based on the value realized, if sold, or a reasonable good faith estimate of the value, if possible.

Mere presence or possession of United States currency, without other indicia of criminal activity, is insufficient cause for seizure.

(I) Upon each owner or party in interest by mailing a copy of the complaint and summons by certified mail to the address as given upon the records of the appropriate department.

(II) Upon each owner or party in interest whose name and address is known, by mailing a copy of the notice by registered mail to the last known address.

(I) At the hearing any owner who has a verified answer on file may show by competent evidence that the conveyance was not used or intended to be used in any manner described in subsection (a)(4) of this section.

(II) At the hearing any owner who has a verified answer on file may show by competent evidence that his interest in the conveyance is not subject to forfeiture because he did not know that the conveyance was being used, had been used, was intended to be used or had been intended to be used in any manner described in subsection (a)(4) of this section.

(III) If the court finds that the property was not used or was not intended to be used in violation of this act, or is not subject to forfeiture under this act, the court shall order the property released to the owner as his right, title, or interest appears on records in the appropriate department as of the seizure.

(IV) An owner, co-owner or claimant of any right, title, or interest in the conveyance may prove that his right, title, or interest, whether under a lien, mortgage, conditional sales contract or otherwise, was created without any knowledge or reason to believe that the conveyance was being used, had been used, was intended to be used, or had been intended to be used for the purpose alleged;
(i) In the event of such proof, the court shall order the conveyance released to the bona fide or innocent owner, purchaser, lienholder, mortgagee, or conditional sales vendor.

To the director, or appropriate prosecuting attorney, for all expenditures made or incurred by him in connection with the sale, including expenditure for any necessary repairs, storage, or transportation of the conveyance, and for all expenditures made or incurred by him in connection with the forfeiture proceedings including, but not limited to, expenditures for witnesses’ fees, reporters’ fees, transcripts, printing, traveling and investigation.

To the law enforcement agency of this state which seized the conveyance for all expenditures for traveling, investigation, storage and other expenses made or incurred after the seizure and in connection with the forfeiture of any conveyance seized under this act.

The remainder, if any, to the director for credit to the drug and driving while under the influence enforcement donation fund or to the appropriate prosecuting attorney for credit to the local drug enforcement donation fund, or its equivalent.

To the director, or prosecuting attorney on behalf of the county or city law enforcement agency, for all expenditures made or incurred in connection with the sale, including expenditure for any necessary repairs, maintenance, storage or transportation, and for all expenditures made or incurred in connection with the forfeiture proceedings including, but not limited to, expenditures for witnesses’ fees, reporters’ fees, transcripts, printing, traveling and investigation.

To the law enforcement agency of this state which seized the property for all expenditures for traveling, investigation, storage and other expenses made or incurred after the seizure and in connection with the forfeiture of any property seized under this act.
(C) The remainder, if any, to the director for credit to the drug and driving while under the influence enforcement donation fund or to the appropriate prosecuting attorney for credit to the local agency’s drug enforcement donation fund; or

The director, or appropriate prosecuting attorney, shall publish a notice of the sale by at least one (1) publication in a newspaper published and circulated in the city, community or locality where the sale is to take place at least one (1) week prior to sale of the property. The proceeds from such sale shall be distributed as follows in the order indicated:

Local law enforcement agencies shall submit the information required by this subsection to the county prosecutor for its jurisdiction on a form as promulgated in rule by the Idaho state police, and such prosecutor shall retain the form for a period of seven (7) years.

§ 37-2744A. Real property subject to forfeiture.

Any real property, including any interest therein and any appurtenances thereto or improvements thereon, which is used in any manner or part, to commit or to facilitate the commission of a violation of the provisions of this chapter punishable by more than one (1) year of imprisonment, shall be subject to forfeiture under the provisions of this section.

Property subject to forfeiture under the provisions of this section may be seized by the director upon determining that a parcel of property is subject to forfeiture, by filing a notice of forfeiture with the recorder of the county in which the property or any part thereof is situated. The notice must contain a legal description of the property sought to be forfeited; provided, however, that in the event the property sought to be forfeited is part of a greater parcel, the director may, for the purposes of this notice, use the legal description of the greater parcel. The director shall also send by certified mail a copy of the notice of forfeiture to any persons holding a recorded interest or of whose interest the director has actual knowledge. The director shall post a similar copy of the notice conspicuously upon the property and publish a copy thereof once a week for three (3) consecutive weeks immediately following the seizure in a newspaper published in the county. The owner or party in lawful possession of the property sought to be forfeited may retain possession and use thereof and may collect and keep income from the property while the forfeiture proceedings are pending.

In the event of a seizure pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, a complaint instituting forfeiture proceedings under subsection (d) of this section shall be filed in the district court in the county in which the real property is situated within ninety (90) days of the date of seizure. The complaint shall be served in the same manner as other complaints subject to the Idaho rules of civil procedure on all persons having an interest in the real property sought to be forfeited.

Real property sought to be forfeited under the provisions of this section shall not be subject to an action for detainer or any other collateral action, but is deemed to be in the custody of the director subject only to the orders and decrees of the district court having jurisdiction over the forfeiture proceedings. Forfeiture proceedings shall be civil proceedings in which the burden of proof shall be on the director to prove by a preponderance of the evidence that the property sought to be forfeited is subject to forfeiture. Upon being satisfied that an owner or claimant as defined in paragraph (4) of this subsection should not be subjected to forfeiture because that person had no knowledge or reason to believe that the real property was being used or had been used for the purposes alleged by the department, the director shall release the property to the owner or other claimant. The procedure applicable to such cases shall be the same as that prescribed by the Idaho rules of civil procedure. Following service the director may, where appropriate, seek default judgment pursuant to the Idaho rules of civil procedure. If an answer is filed the court shall proceed to set the case for hearing before the court without a jury.

Following the hearing, if the court finds that the property is subject to forfeiture pursuant to subsection (a) of this section the court shall order the property forfeited to the director and title shall vest as of the date of the original seizure.

Following the hearing, if the court finds that the property is not subject to forfeiture pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, the court shall order the property released to the owner or owners thereof.

Any owner who has an answer on file may show by competent evidence that his interest in the property sought to be forfeited is not subject to forfeiture because he could not have known in the exercise of reasonable diligence that the real property was being used, or had been used in any manner in violation of the provisions of this section. If the court finds that the property was not used in violation of the provisions of this section or is not subject to forfeiture under the provisions of this section, the court shall order the property released to the owner.

An owner, co-owner or claimant of any right, title or interest in the real property sought to be forfeited may prove that his right, title or interest, whether under a lien, mortgage, or otherwise, was created without any knowledge or reason to believe that the real property was being used or had been used for the purposes alleged by the department;

In the event of such proof, the court shall order the real property released to the innocent owner, purchaser, lienholder or mortgagee.

If the amount due to such person is less than the value of the real property, the real property may be sold in a commercially reasonable manner by the director. The proceeds from such sale shall be distributed as follows in the order indicated:

To the innocent owner, purchaser or mortgagee of the real property, if any, up to the value of his interest in the real property.

The balance, if any, in the following order:

To the director for all expenditures made or incurred by the department in connection with the sale, including expenditure for any necessary repairs or maintenance of the real property, and for all expenditures made or incurred by the department in connection with the forfeiture proceedings including, but not limited to, expenditures for witnesses’ fees, reporters’ fees, transcripts, printing, travel, investigation, title company fees and insurance premiums.

The remainder, if any, to the director for credit to the drug [and driving while under the influence] enforcement donation account.

In issuing any order under the provisions of this section, the court shall make a determination that the property, or a portion thereof, was actually used in violation of the provisions of this act. The size of the property forfeited shall not be unfairly disproportionate to the size of the property actually used in violation of the provisions of this section.

When property is forfeited under the provisions of this section the director may:

Retain it for official use; or

Sell the property in a commercially reasonable manner. The proceeds shall be distributed by the director as follows:

To reimburse for all expenditures made or incurred in connection with the sale, including expenditures for any necessary repairs or maintenance, and for all expenditures made or incurred in connection with the forfeiture proceedings including, but not limited to, expenditures for attorneys’ fees, title company fees, insurance premiums, recording costs, witnesses’ fees, reporters’ fees, transcripts, printing, travel and investigation.

The remainder, if any, shall be credited to the drug [and driving while under the influence] enforcement donation account.

(C) In any case, the director may, within thirty (30) days after judgment, pay the balance due to the innocent owner, purchaser, lienholder or mortgagee and thereby purchase the real property for use in the enforcement of this act.

§ 37-2744B. Authorization to receive and administer federal forfeitures and private donations.

The director of the Idaho state police is authorized to receive and dispose of any real or personal property which has been seized by a federal drug enforcement agency, or any donations from private citizens, the proceeds of which shall be placed in the drug and driving while under the influence enforcement donation fund created in section 57-816, Idaho Code.

§ 37-2745. Burden of proof — Liabilities.

It is not necessary for the state to negate any exemption or exception in this act in any complaint, information, indictment or other pleading or in any trial, hearing, or other proceeding under the provisions of this act. The burden of proof of any exemption or exception is upon the person claiming it.

In the absence of proof that a person is the duly authorized holder of an appropriate registration, valid prescription, or order form issued under the provisions of this act, he is presumed not to be the holder of the registration, valid prescription or form. The burden of proof is upon him to rebut the presumption.

In all prosecutions under the provisions of this act involving the analysis of a controlled substance or a sample thereof, a certified copy of the analytical report with the notarized signature of the bureau chief of the Idaho forensic laboratory and the criminalist who conducted the analysis shall be accepted as prima facie evidence of the results of the analytical findings.

Notwithstanding any statute or rule to the contrary, the defendant may subpoena the criminalist to testify at the preliminary hearing and trial of the issue at no cost to the defendant.

No liability is imposed under the provisions of this act upon any authorized state, county or municipal officer, engaged in the lawful performance of his duties.

§ 37-2746. Judicial review.

All final determinations, findings and conclusions of the board under this act are final and conclusive decisions of the matters involved. Any person aggrieved by the decision may obtain review of the decision in the district court of the county where the aggrieved person resides. Findings of fact by the board, if supported by substantial evidence, are conclusive.

§ 37-2747. Education and research.

The director or his authorized agent shall carry out educational programs designed to prevent and deter misuse and abuse of controlled substances. In connection with these programs he may:

Promote better recognition of the problems of misuse and abuse of controlled substances within the regulated industry and among interested groups and organizations;

Assist the regulated industry and interested groups and organizations in contributing to the reduction of misuse and abuse of controlled substances;

Consult with interested groups and organizations to aid them in solving administrative and organizational problems;

Evaluate procedures, projects, techniques, and controls conducted or proposed as part of educational programs on misuse and abuse of controlled substances;

Disseminate the results of research on misuse and abuse of controlled substances to promote a better public understanding of what problems exist and what can be done to combat them; and

Assist in the education and training of state and local law enforcement officials in their efforts to control misuse and abuse of controlled substances.

The director shall encourage research on misuse and abuse of controlled substances. In connection with the research, and in furtherance of the enforcement of this act, he may:

Establish methods to assess accurately the effects of controlled substances and identify and characterize those with potential for abuse;

Make studies and undertake programs of research to:

Develop new or improved approaches, techniques, systems, equipment and devices to strengthen the enforcement of this act;

Determine patterns of misuse and abuse of controlled substances and the social effects thereof; and

Improve methods for preventing, predicting, understanding and dealing with the misuse and abuse of controlled substances; and

Enter into contracts with public agencies, institutions of higher education, and private organizations or individuals for the purpose of conducting research, demonstrations, or special projects which bear directly on misuse and abuse of controlled substances.

The director may enter into contracts for educational and research activities without performance bonds.

The director may authorize persons engaged in research on the use and effects of controlled substances to withhold the names and other identifying characteristics of individuals who are the subjects of the research. Persons who obtain this authorization are not compelled in any civil, criminal, administrative, legislative, or other proceeding to identify the individuals who are the subjects of research for which the authorization was obtained.

The director may authorize the possession and distribution of controlled substances by persons lawfully engaged in education and research. Persons who obtain this authorization are exempt from state prosecution for possession and distribution of controlled substances to the extent of the authorization.

§ 37-2748. Pending proceedings.

Prosecution for any violation of law occurring prior to the effective date of this act is not affected or abated by this act. If the offense being prosecuted is similar to one set out in article IV of this act, then the penalties under article IV apply if they are less than those under prior law.

Civil seizures or forfeitures and injunctive proceedings commenced prior to the effective date of this act are not affected by this act.

All administrative proceedings pending under prior laws which are superseded by this act shall be continued and brought to a final determination in accord with the laws and rules in effect prior to the effective date of this act. Any substance controlled under prior law which is not listed within schedules I through V, is automatically controlled without further proceedings and shall be listed in the appropriate schedule.

The board shall initially permit persons to register who own or operate any establishment engaged in the manufacture, distribution, or dispensing of any controlled substance prior to the effective date of this act and who are registered or licensed by the state.

This act applies to violations of law, seizures and forfeiture, injunctive proceedings, administrative proceedings and investigations which occur following its effective date.

§ 37-2749. Continuation of rules.

Any orders and rules promulgated under any law affected by this act and in effect on the effective date of this act and not in conflict with it continue in effect until modified, superseded or repealed.

§ 37-2750. Uniformity of interpretation.

This act shall be so applied and construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this act among those states which enact it.

§ 37-2751. Short title.

This act may be cited as the “Uniform Controlled Substances Act.”